Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF530.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; WEATHER FORECASTING GAP-FILLING RADAR DATA.new text end new text begin $1,270,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $2,050,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of public safety for the director of Homeland Security and Emergency Management Division to procure weather forecasting gap-filling radar data and services for the purposes of: (1) filling five critical gaps in low-level observations in Minnesota in the first year and eight critical gaps in subsequent years to inform weather planning, preparation, and response; and (2) enhancing and improving public safety across Minnesota. Radar data procured from this appropriation must also be made available to the Department of Agriculture, Department of Transportation, and Minnesota Pollution Control Agency. The base for this appropriation is $2,050,000 in fiscal years 2028 and 2029. new text end